North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15B. Victims Compensation.
Article 1. Crime Victims Compensation Act.
§ 15B-21.
Annual report. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall, by March 15 each year, prepare and transmit to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and to the chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety a report of its activities in the prior fiscal year and the current fiscal year to date. The report shall include:

The number of claims filed;

The number of awards made;

(2a)

The number of pending cases by year received;

The amount of each award;

A statistical summary of claims denied and awards made;

The administrative costs of the Commission, including the compensation of commissioners;

The current unencumbered balance of the North Carolina Crime Victims Compensation Fund;

The amount of funds carried over from the prior fiscal year;

The amount of funds received in the prior fiscal year from the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and from the compensation fund established pursuant to the Victims Crime Act of 1984, 42 U.S.C. § 10601, et seq.; and

The amount of funds expected to be received in the current fiscal year, as well as the amount actually received in the current fiscal year on the date of the report, from the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and from the compensation fund established pursuant to the Victims Crime Act of 1984, 42 U.S.C. § 10601, et seq.

The Attorney General and State Auditor shall assist the Commission in the preparation of the report required by this section.

History.

1983, c. 832, s. 1; 1987, c. 819, s. 29; 1991, c. 301, s. 1; 1999-237, s. 20.2; 2001-424, s. 26.5; 2004-159, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2015-241, s. 16A.2; 2017-186, s. 2(ffff).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in subdivisions (8) and (9).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 16A.2, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and to the chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety” for “Governor and the General Assembly” in the introductory paragraph.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ffff), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in subdivisions (8) and (9).

§ 15B-21.
Annual report. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Commission shall, by March 15 each year, prepare and transmit to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and to the chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety a report of its activities in the prior fiscal year and the current fiscal year to date. The report shall include:

The number of claims filed;

The number of awards made;

(2a)

The number of pending cases by year received;

The amount of each award;

A statistical summary of claims denied and awards made;

The administrative costs of the Commission, including the compensation of commissioners;

The current unencumbered balance of the North Carolina Crime Victims Compensation Fund;

The amount of funds carried over from the prior fiscal year;

The amount of funds received in the prior fiscal year from the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and from the compensation fund established pursuant to the Victims Crime Act of 1984, 42 U.S.C. § 10601, et seq.; and

The amount of funds expected to be received in the current fiscal year, as well as the amount actually received in the current fiscal year on the date of the report, from the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Adult Correction, and from the compensation fund established pursuant to the Victims Crime Act of 1984, 42 U.S.C. § 10601, et seq.

The Attorney General and State Auditor shall assist the Commission in the preparation of the report required by this section.

History.

1983, c. 832, s. 1; 1987, c. 819, s. 29; 1991, c. 301, s. 1; 1999-237, s. 20.2; 2001-424, s. 26.5; 2004-159, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2015-241, s. 16A.2; 2017-186, s. 2(ffff); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(ggg).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to subdivision (9) of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(ggg), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), effective January 1, 2012, substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Correction” in subdivisions (8) and (9).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 16A.2, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and to the chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety” for “Governor and the General Assembly” in the introductory paragraph.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(ffff), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in subdivisions (8) and (9).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(ggg) substituted “the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Adult Correction” for “the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety,” in the middle of subdivision (9). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 15B-22.
Disbursements.

If compensation awarded under this Article cannot be paid due to insufficient funds in the Crime Victims Compensation Fund, payment shall be delayed until sufficient funds are available and no further awards of compensation shall be made until sufficient funds are available.

History.

1983, c. 832, s. 1; 1987, c. 819, s. 31; 1991, c. 301, s. 1; 2004-159, s. 1.

§ 15B-23.
Crime Victims Compensation Fund.

There is established the Crime Victims Compensation Fund. Revenue in the Crime Victims Compensation Fund includes amounts credited to the Fund under

G.S. 148-2

and other funds. Any surplus in the Crime Victims Compensation Fund shall not revert. The Crime Victims Compensation Fund shall be kept on deposit with the State Treasurer, as in the case of other State funds, and may be invested by the State Treasurer in any lawful security for the investment of State money. The Crime Victims Compensation Fund is subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes.

History.

1987, c. 819, s. 30; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 21.5(b); 2004-159, s. 1.

§ 15B-24.
Requiring defendant to pay restitution encouraged.

Pursuant to a Court’s power to require restitution as a condition of probation, parole or work-release privileges, a Court may require a defendant to pay restitution to a victim, regardless of whether the victim receives compensation from the Crime Victims Compensation Fund, or to the Fund. It is the intent of the General Assembly that a victim’s receipt of compensation from the Fund shall not discourage a Court from considering, where appropriate, payment of restitution by the defendant and alternatives to incarceration of the defendant.

History.

1987, c. 819, s. 33; 2004-159, s. 1.

§ 15B-25.
Compensation limits.

This Article shall not be construed to create a right to receive compensation. Compensation payable under Chapter 15B shall only be available to the extent that the General Assembly appropriates funds that purpose.

History.

1987, c. 819, s. 36; 2004-159, s. 1.

§ 15B-26.
Crime victims credit protection.

A creditor that is owed money for services provided to a victim as a result of the criminally injurious conduct inflicted on the victim shall not communicate any information about the debt to a consumer reporting agency during the pendency of an application for an award filed pursuant to

G.S. 15B-7

or during the pendency of an appeal from a decision related to such an application.

The victim bears the burden of notifying the creditor that the debt is subject to subsection (a) of this section.

A creditor may request monthly verification from the Commission that the application or appeal is still pending, and the Commission shall provide this verification.

History.

2009-355, s. 6.

§§ 15B-27 through 15B-29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.